tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.aff
SET ISO8859-1
# TRY  
TRY aersoinltcdmubpágízfvhéjqóñxyúükCMAIESPGJBRFTDVHUOwLKNZÁYXÜÓÚÉÑQWÍ

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# The affix file below is automatically generated from espa~nol.aff file by
# means of ispellaff2myspell script. Original copyright applies:
# 
# Copyright (c) 1994-2008 Santiago Rodriguez and Jesus Carretero
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details. This software can be
#    obtained from http://www.datsi.fi.upm.es/~coes/
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

SFX J Y 12
SFX J   e     ísimo       e
SFX J   e     ísimos      e
SFX J   e     ísima       e
SFX J   e     ísimas      e
SFX J   o     ísimo       o
SFX J   o     ísima       o
SFX J   o     ísimos      o
SFX J   o     ísimas      o
SFX J   0     ísimo       l
SFX J   0     ísima       l
SFX J   0     ísimos      l
SFX J   0     ísimas      l

SFX M Y 2
SFX M   o     amente      o
SFX M   0     mente       [aelnrsz]

SFX N Y 2
SFX N   r     damente     [ai]r
SFX N   er    idamente    er

SFX P Y 21
SFX P   e     a           e
SFX P   o     a           o
SFX P   0     s           [eo]
SFX P   o     as          o
SFX P   e     as          e
SFX P   z     ces         z
SFX P   án    ana         án
SFX P   án    anes        án
SFX P   án    anas        án
SFX P   ín    ina         ín
SFX P   ín    ines        ín
SFX P   ín    inas        ín
SFX P   ón    ona         ón
SFX P   ón    ones        ón
SFX P   ón    onas        ón
SFX P   0     a           [^aeons]
SFX P   0     es          [^aeonsz]
SFX P   0     as          [^aeons]
SFX P   és    esa         és
SFX P   és    eses        és
SFX P   és    esas        és

SFX H Y 2
SFX H   r     ción        [ai]r
SFX H   r     ciones      [ai]r

SFX I Y 4
SFX I   r     miento      [ai]r
SFX I   r     mientos     [ai]r
SFX I   er    imiento     er
SFX I   er    imientos    er

SFX L Y 6
SFX L   r     nte         ar
SFX L   r     ntes        ar
SFX L   er    iente       er
SFX L   er    ientes      er
SFX L   r     ente        ir
SFX L   r     entes       ir

SFX R Y 24
SFX R   0     me          [aei]r
SFX R   0     te          [aei]r
SFX R   0     se          [aei]r
SFX R   0     nos         [aei]r
SFX R   0     os          [aei]r
SFX R   ar    ándome      ar
SFX R   ar    ándote      ar
SFX R   ar    ándose      ar
SFX R   ar    ándonos     ar
SFX R   ar    ándoos      ar
SFX R   er    iéndome     er
SFX R   er    iéndote     er
SFX R   er    iéndose     er
SFX R   er    iéndonos    er
SFX R   er    iéndoos     er
SFX R   r     éndome      ir
SFX R   r     éndote      ir
SFX R   r     éndose      ir
SFX R   r     éndonos     ir
SFX R   r     éndoos      ir
SFX R   r     dme         [aeií]r
SFX R   r     dnos        [aeií]r
SFX R   r     os          [aeí]r
SFX R   ir    íos         ir

SFX S Y 11
SFX S   0     s           [aeiouáéó]
SFX S   0     es          [úídjlmry]
SFX S   z     ces         z
SFX S   0     es          [^é]s
SFX S   0     es          [^áéíóú]n
SFX S   án    anes        án
SFX S   én    enes        én
SFX S   ín    ines        ín
SFX S   ón    ones        ón
SFX S   ún    unes        ún
SFX S   és    eses        és

SFX T Y 30
SFX T   0     lo          [aei]r
SFX T   0     la          [aei]r
SFX T   0     le          [aei]r
SFX T   0     los         [aei]r
SFX T   0     las         [aei]r
SFX T   0     les         [aei]r
SFX T   ar    ándolo      ar
SFX T   ar    ándola      ar
SFX T   ar    ándole      ar
SFX T   ar    ándolos     ar
SFX T   ar    ándolas     ar
SFX T   ar    ándoles     ar
SFX T   er    iéndolo     er
SFX T   er    iéndola     er
SFX T   er    iéndole     er
SFX T   er    iéndolos    er
SFX T   er    iéndolas    er
SFX T   er    iéndoles    er
SFX T   r     éndolo      ir
SFX T   r     éndola      ir
SFX T   r     éndole      ir
SFX T   r     éndolos     ir
SFX T   r     éndolas     ir
SFX T   r     éndoles     ir
SFX T   r     dlo         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dla         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dle         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dlos        [aei]r
SFX T   r     dlas        [aei]r
SFX T   r     dles        [aei]r
