tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
aborrecer/IOQRTWX
abreviar/HINOPQRSTUVX
aburrir/INOQRTVWX
acantonar/IPSVX
aceitero/PS
acelerar/HINOPQRSTVWX
acezar/LPSVX
achatarrar/IPQSTVWX
acobardar/IOPQRSTVWX
acomodar/HIOPQRSTVX
acompasar/NPSVWX
acortar/IOPQRSTVX
activo/JMPS
adecuar/HNOPQRSTVWX
adiestre/P st:adestrar
administrar/HOPQRSTUVWX
adoptar/LOPQRSTUVWX
adoptivo/PS
adorar/HOPQRSTVX
adormecer/IOQRTWX
adormilar/OPRSVWX
adverso/MPS
afectar/HNOPQRSTVWX
afrontar/IPQSTVX
agitanar/OPQRSTVWX
aglomerar/HLOPQRSTVWX
aguazoso/PS
aguijar/PQSTVWX
ahogar/IOPQRSTVX
ahuecar/IOPQRSTVWX
airar/NOPRSVWX
ajustar/INOPQRSTUVWX
alarmar/LOPQRSTVWX
aletargar/IOPQRSTVWX
alfardilla/S
alhajar/PQSTVWX
aliñar/OPQRSTVWX
almenar/NPSVWX
alto/JMPS
alucinar/HILOPQRSTVWX
amable/MS
amalgamar/HIOPQRSTVWX
amanerar/INOPQRSTVWX
amenorar/PSVX
amigue/JS
amontonar/INOPQRSTVX
amoratar/OPRSVWX
andar/LSWX
anea/S
ansiolítico/PS
anticipar/HILNOPQRSTUVWX
antinatural/MS
apabullar/ILPSVWX
apasionar/ILNOPQRSTVX
apellar/PQSTVWX
apelmazar/IPQSTVWX
apiadador/PS
aplastar/ILOPQRSTVWX
apocar/INOPQRSTVX
apresar/IOPQRSTVX
apretar/INOPQRSTWX
aproximar/HNOPQRSTVWX
apurar/HIOPQRSTVWX
arciprestazgo/S
argumentar/HLPSVX
arqueolítico/PS
arrastrar/ILOPQRSTVWX
arredrar/OPQRSTVX
arrinconar/IOPQRSTVX
artesanal/MS
asesorar/IOPQRSTVX
aspirar/HLPQSTVWX
asustar/OPQRSTVWX
atizar/PQSTVWX
atorar/IOPQRSTVX
atrever/INORVWX
aturrullar/OPQRSTVWX
automotriz/S st:automotor
aventajar/IOPQRSTVWX
averiguar/HIPQSTWX
axiomatizar/HPQSTVWX
azorar/ILOPQRSTVX
bajar/OPQRSTUVWX
baje/JPS
bajo/JPS
banalizar/HOPQRSTVWX
bastar/LOPRSVWX
batir/ILOQRTVWX
beato/JPS
becerro/PS
bello/JMPS
benevolente/JS
benévolo/MPS
bilítero/PS
bono/JS
brillar/LPSVWX
bucólico/PS
cadencioso/MPS
calamite/PS
callar/INOPQRSTVWX
camuflar/OPQRSTVWX
caparrosa/S
capitular/HLMPSVWX
cavador/PS
cegar/IOPQRSTWX
celebrar/HLPQSTVX
centellear/LPSVWX
centuplicar/OPQRSTVWX
cepellón/S
ceremonial/MS
choricear/PQSTVWX
cierto/JMPS
civilizador/PS
claro/JMPS
cobaltina/S
colimar/HPSVWX
combatir/LOQRTVWX
comedir/INRVX
cometer/QTVWX
comparativo/MPS
comportar/IOPRSVX
condicionar/ILNPQSTVX
condimentar/HPQSTVX
conferenciar/LPSVX
conmover/OQRTWX
conocer/INOQRTWX
conspirar/HPSVWX
constante/MS
constipar/OPRSVWX
consuegrar/PSVWX
continuar/HNOPQRSTWX
contratar/HLOPQRSTVWX
correr/ILOQRTVWX
corto/JMPS
coser/OQRTVWX
costoso/JMPS
cristianizar/HPSVWX
cristiano/JMPS
cuajarón/S
culminar/HLPSVWX
culpar/HNOPQRSTVWX
cumplimentar/PQSTVX
decisivo/MPS
declarar/HLNOPQRSTUVWX
definir/HOQRTUVWX
defraudar/HOPQRSTVWX
degradar/HLOPQRSTVWX
deleznar/OPRSVWX
demudar/HIOPQRSTVWX
depurar/HPQSTVWX
desaconsejar/NPQSTVWX
desactivar/HOPQRSTUVWX
desadvertida/S st:desadvertido
desangrar/IOPQRSTVWX
desapasionar/NPSVX
desapañar/PSVWX
desbaratar/IOPQRSTVWX
descargar/IOPQRSTVWX
descasar/IOPQRSTVWX
descollar/ILPSWX
desconsolar/HNOPQRSTWX
descoyuntar/IOPQRSTVWX
desecar/HILPSVWX
desenamorar/IOPQRSTVX
desencantar/IOPQRSTVWX
desentarimar/PSVWX
desenterrar/IPQSTWX
deshollinadera/S
deshonrar/OPQRSTVWX
desinteresar/NOPRSVX
desjuntar/IPSVWX
desleal/MS
deslucir/IOQRTWX
desmultiplicar/HPQSTVWX
desorejar/IPSVWX
despechar/NPSVWX
despegar/IOPQRSTVX
desprender/IOQRTVX
destachonar/PSVX
destapar/OPQRSTVWX
desternillar/LOPRSVWX
desviar/HIOPQRSTUWX
determinar/HLOPQRSTVWX
dihueñe/S
dilatar/HNOPQRSTVWX
diminuto/MPS
discernir/ILOQRTWX
diversificar/HOPQRSTVWX
divinizar/HPQSTVWX
divorciar/OPRSVX
dogmatizar/LPSVWX
donativo/PS
editorial/MS
ejecutorio/PS
embair/HIVWX
emblanquecer/IWX
embocar/PQSTVX
emigrar/HLPSVWX
eminente/JMS
empadronar/IOPQRSTVX
emparejar/IOPQRSTVWX
empobrecedor/PS
enamorar/INOPQRSTVX
enardecer/IOQRTWX
encargar/IOPQRSTUVWX
encarrilar/OPQRSTVWX
encuadernar/HPQSTVX
endurecer/IOQRTWX
enflaquecer/IOQRTWX
engibar/OPQRSTVWX
enguachinar/PSVWX
enorme/JMS
enraizar/IOPRSWX
entender/IOQRTWX
enternecer/INOQRTWX
enterrar/IOPQRSTUWX
entretejer/IQTVWX
enérgico/MPS
epistolario/S
erigir/OQRTVWX
erogar/HPSVX
erístico/PS
escarar/OPQRSTVWX
esmerar/NOPQRSTVWX
esparragar/IPSVWX
espontáneo/MPS
espurrear/OPQRSTUVWX
esquejar/OPQRSTUVWX
estar/HLORX
esterero/PS
esterilizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estilizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estrenar/OPQRSTUVWX
estrepitoso/MPS
excelente/JMS
excitativo/MPS
exclaustrar/HOPQRSTUVWX
exhibir/HOQRTUVWX
experimentar/HPQSTVX
extenso/JMPS
externo/MPS
extrapolable/S
fabular/HOPQRSTUVWX
faroleo/PS
fatigoso/MPS
felpar/OPQRSTUVWX
fertilizar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
festejar/OPQRSTUVWX
figurar/HLNOPQRSTUVWX
filarmónico/MPS
fomentar/HOPQRSTUVX
fonológico/MPS
fotosensible/MS
fregotear/OPQRSTUVWX
frontal/MS
fruncir/IVWX
fumar/LOPQRSTUVWX
fusilar/IOPQRSTVWX
galano/PS
galbanoso/MPS
genotípico/MPS
glótico/PS
goloso/MPS
gradar/HPSVWX
grave/JMPS
grillar/NOPRSVWX
grosero/MPS
groso/JS
guapo/JPS
guipar/PSVWX
guiñar/OPQRSTVWX
heraldista/S
heroico/MPS
hidratar/HLPQSTVWX
hostigo/PS
hábil/MS
idealismo/S
ideologizar/HOPQRSTVWX
ignorar/LOPQRSTVX
ilustre/JMPS
imponderable/MS
importante/JS
improvisar/HNPQSTVWX
incitar/HILPQSTVWX
inconsiderado/MPS
incrustar/HLOPQRSTVWX
indivisible/MS
infestar/HOPQRSTVX
infográfico/PS
infértil/S
ingobernable/MS
inhibir/HOQRTVWX
innatural/MS
insolentar/OPQRSTVX
interior/MS
interiorizar/HPQSTVWX
intrincar/NOPQRSTVWX
irreversible/MS
italianizar/LOPRSVWX
jarretera/S
juanramoniano/PS
justificar/HLNOPQRSTUVWX
justo/JMPS
largue/JS
lateralizar/HOPQRSTVWX
lente/JPS
lento/JMPS
letargo/S
leve/JMPS
lexicalizar/HOPQRSTVWX
librar/HILOPQRSTVWX
limitado/JMPS
lindar/LPSVX
litar/HPSVWX
litúrgico/PS
lujoso/MPS
magistrado/PS
magnificente/JS
mal/JPS
malo/JPS
marcar/HNOPQRSTUVWX
marcear/PQSTVWX
mayador/PS
mecanizar/HOPQRSTVWX
mediar/HLPSVX
mesar/OPQRSTVX
mimar/OPQRSTUVWX
miserable/MS
mismo/JMPS
mitigativo/PS
mixturero/PS
molificar/HPSVWX
mover/ILOQRTUWX
mucho/JPS
municionar/IPSVX
mónera/S
necesitar/OPQRSTUVWX
neutralizar/HLOPQRSTVWX
nombrar/INOPQRSTVWX
nove/JPS
occidental/MS
odioso/MPS
ofrecer/IOQRTUWX
ondear/LPQSTVWX
orificar/HPQSTVWX
originar/OPQRSTVWX
osificar/HOPRSVWX
parabolano/S
parpadear/LPSVWX
pausar/NPSVWX
peluquear/OPQRSTVWX
perdurable/MS
periodismo/S
peritar/HPQSTVWX
personificar/HOPQRSTVWX
pivotar/LPSVWX
pluvímetro/S
politizar/HOPQRSTVWX
polvorear/IPSVWX
posar/LOPQRSTVX
precipitar/HLNOPQRSTVWX
predestinar/HPSVWX
preparatorio/MPS
principiar/LPQSTVX
privilegiar/NPSVX
privilegiativo/PS
procurar/HOPQRSTVWX
proliferar/HLPSVWX
próximo/MPS
puro/JMPS
quejoso/MPS
racimudo/PS
raciocinar/HPSVWX
radiotelegrafiar/PQSTWX
rapar/ILOPQRSTVWX
raro/JMPS
razonar/INOPQRSTUVX
rebajar/IOPQRSTUVWX
recalentar/IOPQRSTWX
recente/JPS
rechazar/IOPQRSTVWX
reconciliar/HOPQRSTVX
refrendar/HPQSTVX
refrescar/ILOPQRSTUVWX
regañar/IOPQRSTVWX
regleta/S
rehabilitar/HOPQRSTVWX
reimportar/HPSVX
reiterar/HNOPQRSTUVWX
rendir/HINOQWY
representante/PS
reputar/HOPQRSTVWX
resignar/HNOPQRSTVWX
resolver/OQRTUWY
resplandecer/ILWX
restriñir/I
resucitar/HPQSTVWX
reverendo/JPS
ribadoquín/S
roturar/HPQSTVWX
rozar/IOPQRSTVWX
rutilar/LPSVWX
sabio/MPS
samosateno/PS
santificar/HLOPQRSTVWX
santo/JMPS
sentar/IOPQRSTUWX
sentir/INOQWY
serene/JPS
sereno/JPS
señalar/INOPQRSTVWX
silva/S
simple/JMS
sincopar/NPSVWX
sincronizar/HOPQRSTVWX
singularizar/OPQRSTVWX
sobrevivir/LVWX
solemne/MS
soñador/PS
sublimar/HOPQRSTVWX
subordinar/HLNOPQRSTVWX
sudorífero/PS
sulfatar/HPSVWX
sumare/JPS
superar/HLOPQRSTVWX
taladrar/PQSTVWX
tanto/JPS
tembletear/PSVWX
tenazazo/PS
tenebroso/MPS
tintinear/LPSVWX
titulizar/HPQSTVWX
trabajo/PS
trabar/IOPQRSTVWX
trasfigurar/HOPQRSTVWX
traslucir/ILOQRTWX
triplicar/HPSVWX
triscar/OPQRSTVWX
turbar/HILNOPQRSTVWX
urgente/MS
vacilar/HLPSVWX
valioso/JPS
vandálico/PS
verberar/HPSVWX
videoteléfono/S
visualizar/HOPQRSTVWX
votar/HLOPQRSTVWX
zoroástrico/PS
